Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 6

Corporations, Partnerships and Firms

62-2-601. Practice — Disclosure.

A corporation, partnership or firm offering architectural, engineering or landscape architectural service to the public may engage in the practice of architecture, engineering or landscape architecture in this state; provided, that at least one (1) of the principals or officers of the corporation, partnership or firm is in responsible charge of the practice and is registered as required in this chapter for architects, engineers and landscape architects or is otherwise by this chapter authorized to practice. The same exemptions shall apply to corporations, partnerships and firms as apply to individuals under this chapter.

Corporations, partnerships or firms offering engineering, architectural or landscape architectural service to the public shall file with the board, on a form prescribed by the board, a listing of names and addresses of all principals and officers, as well as the principals or officers duly registered to practice architecture, engineering or landscape architecture in this state who are in responsible charge of the practice in this state. The corporations, partnerships or firms shall advise the board in writing within sixty (60) days of any change of status.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 32; T.C.A., § 62-232; Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 20.

62-2-602. Registered architect, engineer or landscape architect in charge of service.

Corporations, partnerships, and firms maintaining any place of business in this state for the purpose of providing or offering to provide architectural, engineering or landscape architectural design to the public shall have, in responsible charge of the service at any and each place of business, a resident registered architect, a registered engineer or a registered landscape architect.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 33; T.C.A., § 62-233; Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 21.